Arkansas, session 2025, SB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-5-212 is amended to read as follows:
15-5-212. Approval of Legislative Council for certain matters.
(a) The Arkansas Development Finance Authority or the Secretary of the
Department of Commerce on behalf of the authority shall not employ or select
any investment banker, consultant, professional financial advisor, or
attorney unless the selection criteria to be used in the selection have been
submitted to the Legislative Council for review.
(b)(1) As soon as practicable after closing any new bond issue, the
authority shall submit a program fact sheet for the new bond issue to the
Legislative Council for its review. The program fact sheet shall include, but
not be limited to, the fees, interest rates, average coupon life of the
*JLL210*
03/05/2025 9:58:56 AM JLL210

SB384
securities, and gross spread for the new bond issue.
(2) A copy of each program fact sheet shall be submitted to
Arkansas Legislative Audit at the same time that the program fact sheet is
submitted to the Legislative Council.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-5-317(e), concerning the power of the
Arkansas Development Finance Authority to enter into an interest rate
exchange agreement or similar agreement or contract, is amended to read as
follows:
(e) Pursuant to the authority's reporting requirement under § 15-5-
212, the The authority shall disclose to the Governor and to the Legislative
Council each interest rate exchange agreement or similar agreement or
contract to which the authority is a party.























03/05/2025 9:58:56 AM JLL210